Utah statutes.
58-54-304.   Scope of practice for radiologist assistant.

(1)  The scope of practice for a radiologist assistant includes:

(a)  determination of whether a patient has been appropriately prepared for the radiologic procedure;

(b)  assessment and evaluation of the physiologic responsiveness of a patient undergoing a radiologic procedure;

(c)  assessment and evaluation of possible contraindications to a procedure;

(d)  obtaining informed consent from the patient as specified by a Delegation of Services Agreement between the radiologic assistant and the supervising radiologist in accordance with Subsection (2);

(e)  evaluation of image quality and communication of initial image observations only to the supervising radiologist;

(f)  administration of contrast media or other medications prescribed by the supervising radiologist; and

(g)  performance of radiologic procedures under the indirect supervision of a radiologist.

(2)  The radiologist assistant and supervising radiologist shall enter into a Delegation of Services Agreement identifying radiologic procedures to be performed by the radiologist assistant and establishing a regular review process by the supervising radiologist for all work performed by and records kept by the radiologist assistant.  The Delegation of Services Agreement shall:

(a)  be kept at the place of practice at which the radiologist assistant is performing delegated services; and

(b)  be consistent with radiologist assistant practice guidelines developed by the American College of Radiology, as supplemented by recognized radiology organizations such as the American Society of Radiologic Technologists and the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists.

(3)  The radiologist assistant shall not interpret images, provide diagnosis, or prescribe medications or therapies.

